src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Meänkieli propernoun morphology

This file documents `affixes/propernouns.lexc`, [the file for Meänkieli propernoun morphology](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc). The file pointing here is `stems/fit-propernouns.lexc`

The lexicon names look like this: `p_mal_1` etc. They have 3 parts, divided by "_"

- In the first part, **p**  = even syll. proper noun, **3p** in lexicon names = even syll. proper noun
- The first part gives the semantic tag. Names that can be both plc and sur are marked plc.
- The third part is identical to the number in the `affixes/noun.lexc` file. Thus, **_1** points to the lexicon **x1**, etc.

We do not use **_pl** for names

- **LEXICON p_plc_0**

- **LEXICON p_sur_0**

- **LEXICON p_surplc_0**

- **LEXICON p_sur_4**

- **LEXICON p_surplc_4**

- **LEXICON p_21ie**

- **LEXICON p_22oi**

- **LEXICON p_nen**

- **LEXICON p_C**

- **LEXICON p_ani_1**

- **LEXICON p_ani_41**

... and many more.

Vowel stems, odd and even stems

Consonant stems, odd and even stems

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>

---
